Mississippi, session 2026, SB3405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Ray Gillespie of Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of armed robbery in Oktibbeha County. The Mississippi Department of Corrections has represented that after a complete search of its records that it does not have any records for Ray Gillespie. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.